apertium-cat-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="parchè__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cusì__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="/esse__vbser">
      <e><p><l>esse</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>essendu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sò</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sè</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hè</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>semu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sete</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sò</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sia</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sia</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sia</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>siamu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>siate</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sianu</l><r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/avè__vbhaver">
      <e><p><l>avè</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avèndu</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>aghju</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hà</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avemu</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>emu</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avete</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ete</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anu</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>aghja</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aghja</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aghja</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aghjamu</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aghjhate</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aghjanu</l><r>avè<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="p/udè__vbmod">
      <e><p><l>udè</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ossu</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oi</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ò</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>udemu</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>udete</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onu</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fini/sce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>sce</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sci</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sce</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scinu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sca</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sca</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sca</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scamu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scate</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scanu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="capi/sce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>sce</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sci</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sce</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scemu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scenu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sca</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sca</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sca</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scamu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scate</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>scanu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>sce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cunn/osce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>osce</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oscu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>osci</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>osce</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscemu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iscite</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oscenu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>isciutu</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isciuta</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isciuti</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isciute</l><r>osce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="parchè"><i>parchè</i><par n="parchè__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cumu"><i>cumu</i><par n="parchè__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="quandu"><i>quandu</i><par n="parchè__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ùn"><i>ùn</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="micca"><i>micca</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cusì"><i>cusì</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bè"><i>bè</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="oghje"><i>oghje</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="assai"><i>assai</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="forse"><i>forse</i><par n="cusì__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="esse"><i></i><par n="/esse__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="avè"><i></i><par n="/avè__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="pudè"><i>p</i><par n="p/udè__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="cunnosce"><i>cunn</i><par n="cunn/osce__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="capisce"><i>capi</i><par n="capi/sce__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="finisce"><i>fini</i><par n="fini/sce__vblex"/></e>
